Nebraska, session 109, LB41A.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
Section 1. There is hereby appropriated (1) $8,798 from the Medicaid
Managed Care Excess Profit Fund and $19,223 from federal funds for FY2025-26
and (2) $7,655 from the Medicaid Managed Care Excess Profit Fund and $16,305
from federal funds for FY2026-27 to the Department of Health and Human
Services, for Program 344, to aid in carrying out the provisions of Legislative
Bill 41, One Hundred Ninth Legislature, First Session, 2025.
There is included in the appropriation to this program for FY2025-26
$8,798 Cash Funds and $19,223 federal funds for state aid, which shall only be
used for such purpose. There is included in the appropriation to this program
for FY2026-27 $7,655 Cash Funds and $16,305 federal funds for state aid, which
shall only be used for such purpose.
No expenditures for permanent and temporary salaries and per diems for
state employees shall be made from funds appropriated in this section.
Sec. 2. There is hereby appropriated (1) $69,777 from the Medicaid
Managed Care Excess Profit Fund and $85,802 from federal funds for FY2025-26
and (2) $72,860 from the Medicaid Managed Care Excess Profit Fund and $86,780
from federal funds for FY2026-27 to the Department of Health and Human
Services, for Program 348, to aid in carrying out the provisions of Legislative
Bill 41, One Hundred Ninth Legislature, First Session, 2025.
There is included in the appropriation to this program for FY2025-26
$69,777 Cash Funds and $85,802 federal funds for state aid, which shall only be
used for such purpose. There is included in the appropriation to this program
for FY2026-27 $72,860 Cash Funds and $86,780 federal funds for state aid, which
shall only be used for such purpose.
No expenditures for permanent and temporary salaries and per diems for
state employees shall be made from funds appropriated in this section.
-1-